Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.160

Matching funds from political subdivision may be required.

The emergency management agency is hereby authorized to require of any political subdivision to which funds are allocated under this chapter for any project, use or activity that such subdivision shall provide matching funds in equal amounts with respect to such project, use or activity.

[ 1984 c 38 s 15; 1974 ex.s. c 171 s 18; 1951 c 178 s 19.]